Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.340

Creditable service, what to consist of.

Creditable service of a member at retirement shall consist of the membership service rendered for which credit has been allowed, and also, if a prior service certificate is in full force and effect, the amount of the service certified on the prior service certificate. No pension payments shall be made for service credits established or reestablished after July 1, 1955, if such credits entitle the member to retirement benefits from any other public state or local retirement system or fund. No pension payments shall be made for service credits established or reestablished after July 1, 1961, if such credits entitle the member to retirement benefits from a public federal retirement system or fund for services rendered under a civilian program: PROVIDED, That no pension payments shall be made for service credits established or reestablished after July 1, 1969, if credit for the same service is retained for benefits under any other retirement system or fund.

[ 1991 c 35 s 45; 1969 ex.s. c 150 s 11; 1961 c 132 s 3; 1955 c 274 s 15; 1947 c 80 s 34; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4995-53. Prior: 1941 c 97 s 4, part; 1939 c 86 s 4, part; 1937 c 221 s 5, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 4995-5, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Effective date—1969 ex.s. c 150: See note following RCW 41.50.200.